Louisiana, session 2026, HB505.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 3:3210(B), 3242(A), 3244, 3246(A), and 3251(B)(4) are hereby
amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§3210. Pesticide Fund
* * *
B. After compliance with the requirements of Article VII, Section 9(B) of
the Constitution of Louisiana relative to the Bond Security and Redemption Fund,
and prior to monies being placed in the state general fund, an amount equal to that
deposited as required by Subsection A hereof of this Section shall be credited to a
special fund hereby created in the state treasury to be known as the "Pesticide Fund".
The monies in this fund shall be used solely as provided in Subsection C hereof of
this Section and only in the amounts appropriated by the legislature. All unexpended
and unencumbered monies in this fund at the end of the fiscal year shall be returned
to the state general remain in the fund. The monies in this fund shall be invested by
the state treasurer in the same manner as monies in the state general fund, and
interest earned on the investment of these monies shall be credited to the state
general fund.
* * *
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 505 ENROLLED
§3242. Certification of commercial applicators
A. No person shall apply or supervise the application of any restricted use
pesticide as a commercial applicator unless that person has the proper certification.
Certification shall be issued only after the applicant has satisfactorily passed an
examination. The commissioner shall establish categories and subcategories for
certification in different areas of commercial application and shall establish specific
standards for each category and subcategory. Certification shall be valid for three
years and shall be renewed in accordance with rules adopted by the commissioner.
The commissioner by rule shall provide for the issuance of annual certification cards
every three years to coincide with the certification renewal period. Commercial
applicators may supervise the ground application of restricted use pesticides within
the commercial applicator's certification by competent uncertified individuals who
are under the direct supervision of the commercial applicator. Commercial
applicators shall not supervise the aerial application of any pesticide by any
uncertified person.
* * *
§3244. Certification of pesticide salespersons
No person shall sell or supervise the sale of restricted use pesticides as a
pesticide salesperson unless that person has the proper certification. Certification
shall be issued only after the applicant has satisfactorily passed an examination.
Certification shall be valid for three years and shall be renewed in accordance with
rules adopted by the commissioner. The commissioner by rule shall provide for the
issuance of annual certification cards every three years to coincide with the
certification renewal period. Pesticide salespersons may supervise the sale of
restricted use pesticides by competent uncertified individuals who are under the
direct supervision of the pesticide salespersons.
* * *
§3246. Certification and licensing of agricultural consultants
A. No person shall be employed as an agricultural consultant unless that
person has the proper certification. Certification shall be issued only after the
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 505 ENROLLED
applicant has satisfactorily passed an examination. Certification shall be valid for
three years and shall be renewed in accordance with rules adopted by the
commissioner. The commissioner by rule shall provide for the issuance of annual
certification cards every three years to coincide with the certification renewal period.
* * *
§3251. Fees
* * *
B. The fees for the licenses and certificates issued or reissued by the
commissioner shall be as follows:
* * *
(4) The fee for issuing the annual triennial certification card shall be twenty
sixty dollars. This provision shall not apply to private applicators.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.